Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle C. Subsequent Acquisition of Shares by Shareholders and Corporation.

§79-4-6.30.
Shareholders’ preemptive rights.

The shareholders of a corporation do not have a preemptive right to acquire the corporation’s unissued shares except to the extent the articles of incorporation so provide.

A statement included in the articles of incorporation that “the corporation elects to have preemptive rights” (or words of similar import) means that the following principles apply except to the extent the articles of incorporation expressly provide otherwise:

The shareholders of the corporation have a preemptive right granted on uniform terms and conditions prescribed by the board of directors to provide a fair and reasonable opportunity to exercise the right, to acquire proportional amounts of the corporation’s unissued shares upon the decision of the board of directors to issue them.

A shareholder may waive his preemptive right. A waiver evidenced by a writing is irrevocable even though it is not supported by consideration.

There is no preemptive right with respect to:

Holders of shares of any class without general voting rights but with preferential rights to distributions or assets have no preemptive rights with respect to shares of any class.

Holders of shares of any class with general voting rights but without preferential rights to distributions or assets have no preemptive rights with respect to shares of any class with preferential rights to distributions or assets unless the shares with preferential rights are convertible into or carry a right to subscribe for or acquire shares without preferential rights.

Shares subject to preemptive rights that are not acquired by shareholders may be issued to any person for a period of one (1) year after being offered to shareholders at a consideration set by the board of directors that is not lower than the consideration set for the exercise of preemptive rights. An offer at a lower consideration or after the expiration of one (1) year is subject to the shareholders’ preemptive rights.

Shares issued as compensation to directors, officers, agents or employees of the corporation, its subsidiaries or affiliates;

Shares issued to satisfy conversion or option rights created to provide compensation to directors, officers, agents or employees of the corporation, its subsidiaries or affiliates;

Shares authorized in articles of incorporation that are issued within six (6) months from the effective date of incorporation;

Shares sold otherwise than for money.

For purposes of this section, “shares” includes a security convertible into or carrying a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.30, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

What constitutes waiver of stockholder’s or corporation’s right to enforce first-option stock purchase agreement.
55 A.L.R.3d 723.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 438 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:696, 74:697.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 62.

3 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 379, Waiver of Right to Enforce “First Option” Stock Purchase Requirement, §§ 16 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 265, 277.

§79-4-6.31.
Corporation’s acquisition of its own shares.

A corporation may acquire its own shares, and shares so acquired constitute authorized but unissued shares.

If the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissue of the acquired shares, the number of authorized shares is reduced by the number of shares acquired.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.31; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment deleted “effective upon amendment of the articles of incorporation” following “shares acquired” in (b); and deleted former (c).

Board of directors authorized to adopt amendments to articles of incorporation to reflect reduction in authorized shares or to delete a class of changes as a result of the operation of this section without shareholder approval, see § 79-4-10.05.

Where the trial court held that promissory notes of a corporation executed for the purchase of the corporation’s stock from the payees were good and valid obligations and no cross-appeal was taken from this finding, the question was not reviewable on appeal. Cooper v. Mississippi Land Co., 220 So. 2d 302, 1969 Miss. LEXIS 1451 (Miss. 1969).

The deed of an insolvent corporation, or of a corporation rendered insolvent by reason of its execution, by which it undertook to convey substantially all of its assets to persons who were all of its officers, directors, and stockholders is void; for insiders cannot prefer themselves in payment of pre-existing debts and thus deprive other creditors of the corporation of their claims; and such creditors had a lien upon the assets of the corporation superior to that of a mortgagee which held a deed of trust executed by the corporation’s grantees as to all property not covered by prior deeds of trust executed by the corporation. Cooper v. Mississippi Land Co., 220 So. 2d 302, 1969 Miss. LEXIS 1451 (Miss. 1969).

This section [Code 1942, § 5311], by clearest implication, permits a corporation to retire its stock at will unless in the process it renders the corporation insolvent, and it follows that where a particular transaction working a retirement of capital stock is attacked, the burden is on the moving party to show insolvency. Alcott Co. v. Raphael, 275 F.2d 551, 1960 U.S. App. LEXIS 5200 (5th Cir. Miss. 1960).

In order to set aside a conveyance of real estate by a bankrupt corporation to its stockholder, the trustee in bankruptcy must prove the insolvency of the corporation following, and as a result of, the transfer. Alcott Co. v. Raphael, 275 F.2d 551, 1960 U.S. App. LEXIS 5200 (5th Cir. Miss. 1960).

Construction and operation of statute restricting corporation’s right to purchase its own stock to purchase from surplus. 61 A.L.R.3d 1049.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity”.
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1775 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 1028.